Tennessee, session 114, SB1835.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-6-228(a), is amended by deleting
the language "taxed at the rate of four percent (4%)" and substituting instead the language
"taxed at the rate of two percent (2%)".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1835
011456
- 1 -